Washington statutes.
RCW 38.12.150

Officer to take oath.

Every officer, duly commissioned or warranted shall within such time as may be provided by law or by regulations, take the oath of office prescribed by law, and give bond, if required. In case of neglect or refusal so to do, the officer shall be considered to have resigned such office and a new appointment may be made as provided by law.

[ 1989 c 19 s 19; 1943 c 130 s 29; Rem. Supp. 1943 s 8603-29. Prior: 1917 c 107 s 26; 1909 c 134 s 36, part; 1895 c 108 s 51.]